Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 6. Education for Gifted Children.

Sec. 14.30.352.
Programs for gifted children.

Every school district shall establish educational services for gifted children that provide for student identification, student eligibility, student learning plans, and parental and student participation, including an appropriate review process, consistent with regulations adopted by the department.

State reimbursement for transportation of gifted children shall be as provided for transportation of all other pupils, except that eligibility for reimbursement is not limited to transportation between the child’s residence and the school, but shall also include transportation between a school and another location of instruction as routinely required by the gifted education program of the district.

History.

(§ 35 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For provision giving continuing effect, until amended or repealed, to certain regulations adopted by the State Board of Education and Early Development and in effect on July 1, 2001, that are not inconsistent with the 2001 addition of AS

14.30.352

, see § 42(b), ch. 67, SLA 2001, in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: gifted children, see 4 AAC 52, art. 3.